Utah statutes.
48-2a-209 (Repealed 07/01/13).   Delivery of certificates to limited partners.

Upon the return by the division pursuant to Section 48-2a-206 of a stamped copy of any certificate, the general partners shall promptly deliver or mail a copy of the certificate of limited partnership and each certificate of amendment or cancellation to each limited partner unless the partnership agreement provides otherwise.



Enacted by Chapter 233, 1990 General Session 

Repealed by Chapter 353, 2011 General Session

